Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-203 Classes of insurance. For
the purposes of this code, the classes of insurance are: life insurance
(including industrial and group life insurance) as defined in section
431:1-204; accident and health or sickness insurance, also referred to as disability
insurance (including group disability insurance), as defined in section
431:1-205; property insurance as defined in section 431:1-206; marine and
transportation insurance as defined in section 431:1-207; vehicle insurance as
defined in section 431:1-208; general casualty insurance as defined in section
431:1-209; surety insurance as defined in section 431:1-210; and such other
classes as may be authorized by law. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c
155, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next